Virginia statutes. Title 60.2. Unemployment Compensation.
Article 3. Special Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund.

§ 60.2-314.
Fund continued; interest and penalties paid into fund.

The special fund in the state treasury known as the Special Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund is continued. All interest, penalties, fees, and costs regardless of when the same became payable, collected from employers and claimants under the provisions of this title, shall be paid into this fund.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-102; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-119; 1986, c. 480; 1990, c. 687.

§ 60.2-315.
Proper expenditures from fund.

No part of the Special Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund shall be expended or available for expenditure in lieu of federal funds made available to the Commission for the administration of this title. Such fund shall be used by the Commission for the payment of costs and charges of administration, including the cost of capital projects of the Virginia Employment Commission, and discretionary expenditures not to exceed $375,000 per fiscal year authorized in the general appropriations act, which are found by the Commission not to be proper and valid charges payable out of any funds in the Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund received from any source. Such costs and charges shall include any interest due on Title XII advances to the trust fund for the payment of benefits. Refunds of interest, allowable under §

60.2-524

, shall be made from this special fund, provided such interest was deposited in such fund.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-103; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-120; 1983, c. 16; 1985, c. 323; 1986, c. 480; 2007, c. 241.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 241 substituted “$375,000” for “$200,000” in the second sentence.

§ 60.2-316.
Disbursements by State Treasurer upon warrants of Comptroller.

All payments and disbursements from the Special Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer upon warrants of the Comptroller issued upon vouchers signed by the Commissioner, or by such other person as the Commissioner may designate for that purpose.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-104; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-121; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-317.
Moneys in fund continuously available to Commission.

The moneys in the Special Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund shall be continuously available to the Commission for expenditure in accordance with the provisions of this article.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-105; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-122; 1986, c. 480.